Arkansas, session 2025, SB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1217 is repealed.
19-5-1217. Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental
Quality and may be used to:
(1) Promote market research and development grants to determine
the most efficient means of collecting, transporting, and processing scrap
electronic equipment;
(2) Work with the Department of Finance and Administration and
the Marketing and Redistribution Section to establish statewide contracts for
*JMB239*
04-07-2025 15:52:42 JMB239

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB369
computer and electronics recycling and demanufacturing businesses; and
(3) Support and fund other measures necessary to implement and
promote the recycling, donation, demanufacturing, or disposal options for
computers and electronic equipment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-34-108 is amended to read as follows:
25-34-108. Disbursement of revenues.
Funds generated from the sale of agency surplus computer and electronic
equipment to state employees, public schools, or by other sale shall be
allocated as follows:
(1) If the sale of surplus computer or electronic equipment is
made within the agency:
(A) Sixty percent (60%) of the proceeds shall be returned
to the owning agency; and
(B) Fifteen percent (15%) Forty percent (40%) of the
proceeds shall be deposited with the Marketing and Redistribution Section;
and
(C) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be
deposited into the Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund established by this
chapter; and
(2) If the sale of surplus computer or electronic equipment is
outside the agency and conducted by the Marketing and Redistribution Section:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be returned
to the owning agency; and
(B) Twenty-five percent (25%) Fifty percent (50%) of the
proceeds shall be deposited with the Marketing and Redistribution Section;
and
(C) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be
deposited into the fund established by this chapter and § 19-5-1217.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code §§ 25-34-109 and 25-34-110 are repealed.
25-34-109. Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State,
Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as
the “Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental
04-07-2025 15:52:42 JMB239

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB369
Quality and may be used to:
(1) Promote market research and development grants to determine
the most efficient means of collecting, transporting, and processing scrap
electronic equipment;
(2) Work with the Department of Finance and Administration and
the Marketing and Redistribution Section to establish statewide contracts for
computer and electronics recycling and demanufacturing businesses; and
(3) Support and fund other measures necessary to implement and
promote the recycling, donation, demanufacturing, or disposal options for
computers and electronic equipment.

25-34-110. Computer and electronic equipment recycling grants.
(a) Electronic equipment recycling grants must be awarded on the basis
of written grant-request proposals submitted to and approved by the Division
of Environmental Quality.
(b) Grant requests shall be considered based upon the following
criteria:
(1) The development of sustained processes for recovery,
recycling, and demanufacturing of scrap computers and electronics;
(2) Minimization and elimination of substantial volumes of this
material as waste;
(3) Creation of Arkansas jobs;
(4) Return of investment analysis; and
(5) Available funds.

/s/Irvin










04-07-2025 15:52:42 JMB239